Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska73-201
Legislative findings.

The Legislature finds that:

(1) Article IV, section 6, of the Constitution of Nebraska requires that the affairs of the state be economically and efficiently administered and thereby imposes a duty to expend no more for any service than it is worth;

(2) The types and provisions of contracts executed on behalf of the state have a direct bearing on the economical and efficient administration of the affairs of the state; and

(3) Fee-for-service contracts are the usual, customary, and accepted manner of contracting on behalf of the state.

Laws 1995, LB 519, § 1.